Utah statutes.
70D-3-206.   Challenging information in the nationwide database.

The commissioner shall by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, provide a process under which an individual may challenge information contained in the nationwide database.



Enacted by Chapter 72, 2009 General Session

